src/pron-eng-lex.txt
LEXICON Pronoun 

Personal ;
Demonstrative ;
Reflexive ;

LEXICON Personal
I+Pron+Nom:I # ;
I+Pron+Acc:me # ;
I+Pron+Poss:my # ;
you+Pron:you # ;
you+Pron+Poss:your # ;
we+Pron+Nom:we # ;
we+Pron+Acc:us # ;
we+Pron+Poss:our # ;
they+Pron+Nom:they # ;
they+Pron+Acc:them # ;
they+Pron+Poss:their # ;
it+Pron:it # ;
it+Pron+Poss:its # ;
he+Pron+Nom:he # ;
he+Pron+Acc:him # ;
he+Pron+Poss:his # ;
she+Pron+Nom:she # ;
she+Pron+Acc:her # ;
she+Pron+Poss:her # ;



LEXICON Demonstrative
this+Pron+Dem:this # ;
that+Pron+Dem:that # ;

LEXICON Determiner
a+Det:a # ;
a+Det:an # ;
the+Det:the # ;

LEXICON Reflexive
myself refl ;
yourself refl ;
himself refl ;
herself refl ;
itself refl ;
ourselves refl ;
themselves refl ;

LEXICON refl
+Pron+Refl # ;
